Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1864.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1748.1-A(a) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, added July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1748.1-A. Enrollee wellness checks.(a) [Requirements] Online requirements.--A cyber charter school shall, at least once during any week consisting of at least three full or partial days of academic instruction, ensure that each enrolled student is able to be visibly seen and communicated with in real time by a teacher, administrator or other representative of the cyber charter school[, either in 12345678910111213141516171819 person or] via electronic means, in order to ensure the well-being of the student and verify participation in the educational program. The requirement under this subsection may be satisfied by students turning on a webcam during synchronous online instruction.(a.1) In-person requirements.--A cyber charter school shall, at least once every three weeks during academic instruction, ensure that each enrolled student is able to be communicated with in-person by a teacher, administrator or other representative of the cyber charter school in order to ensure the well-being of the student and verify participation in the educational program.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1864PN2313 - 2 - 1234567891011121314